Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3089.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18.8 of the General Laws entitled "Healthcare Accessibility and
Quality Assurance Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18.8-3.1. Unilateral modification of provider contracts prohibited.
(a) No healthcare entity, as defined in § 27-18.8-2, including any affiliate, subsidiary, or
contracted vendor acting on behalf of the healthcare entity, that offers, issues, or renews a health
plan in this state, shall unilaterally modify, amend, or reinterpret any material term or condition of
a contract with a healthcare provider, during the term of such contract.
(b) For purposes of this section, a "material term or condition" means and includes, but is
not limited to, changes to reimbursement methodologies or underlying fee schedules; payment
terms; carrier policies, protocols, or procedures; definitions of covered services or covered sites of
service; utilization review requirements, prior authorization requirements, or medical necessity
criteria; quality management or quality improvement requirements; credentialing requirements;
billing or documentation requirements; clinical policy bulletins or coverage determination or
covered preventive health services.
(c) Material terms and conditions shall include any policy, protocol, fee schedule, provider
manual, or guidance incorporated by reference into the contract, whether issued electronically or
otherwise.
(d) A healthcare entity may implement changes to a health carrier contract only:

(1) Upon the mutual written agreement of the healthcare entity and the healthcare provider;
or
(2) Where such change is expressly required by state or federal law.
(e) Any change not required by law shall not take effect until the renewal of the contract
term and then only if the healthcare entity has provided written notice of the proposed change at
least ninety (90) days before the renewal.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006058
========
LC006058 - Page 2 of 3